Utah statutes.
41-6a-1703.   Prohibition as to passenger riding on improper portion of
motor vehicle -- Exceptions.
(1)  A person may not ride and a person operating a motor vehicle may not
knowingly permit a person to ride on any portion of a vehicle not designed or
intended for the use of passengers.
(2)  This provision does not apply to:
(a)  a vehicle that is not being operated on a highway;
(b)  an employee engaged in the necessary discharge of the employee's duty; or
(c)  a person riding within or on a motor vehicle in a space intended for a
load on the vehicle.
